Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 4

Wetlands

11-14-401. Short title — Acquisition of wetlands and forests — Part definitions.

This part, as well as § 67-4-409(g), shall be known and may be cited as the “U.A. Moore Wetlands Acquisition Act.”

The general assembly finds and declares that it is in the general interest of the people of Tennessee:

To preserve certain wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests in our state, those being defined as follows:

“Bottomland hardwood forests” means forests occurring on alluvial soils in floodplains in which tupelo, blackgum, sweetgum, oaks, southern cypress, elm, ash, cottonwood, singly or in combination, comprise a plurality of the stocking except where pines comprise twenty-five percent (25%) to fifty percent (50%), in which case the stand would be classified as oak pine; and

“Wetlands” means lands which have hydric soils and a dominance (fifty percent (50%) or more of stem count based on communities) of obligate hydrophytes. They include the following generic types:

Fresh water meadows;

Shallow fresh water marshes;

Shrub swamps with semipermanent water regimes most of the year;

Wooded swamps or forested wetlands;

Open fresh water except farm ponds; and

Bogs;

That the director of the wildlife resources agency be authorized to acquire wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests, and lands which are capable of supporting hydrophytes or bottomland hardwood forests of a composition normally occurring in that area of the state, including adjacent tracts of land and tracts of land which are significant for the protection of wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests, the acquisition of which may be necessary and desirable to ensure the proper management of such wetlands and forests, on behalf of the state using the proceeds from the increase in revenues resulting from the 1986 increase in the tax levied in § 67-4-409. The director is also authorized to purchase any lands adjacent to Reelfoot Lake which may be necessary for the management and preservation of such lake from such revenues, and to purchase areas meeting the definition of “converted” wetlands as defined by the United States department of agriculture within the Food Security Act of 1985, and amendments thereto; and

To establish a partnership between the state and private, nonprofit corporations, qualifying under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), for the purpose of implementing the expeditious acquisitions of interests in wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests should the director or state choose to use such corporations.

Notwithstanding this part, § 67-4-409, or any other law to the contrary, the director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the purpose of acquiring certain upland hardwood forests which are located within Scott and Campbell counties and are known as the “Koppers Properties,” including lands adjacent thereto.

Notwithstanding this part, § 67-4-409 or any other law to the contrary, the director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition of certain uplands and canyon which are located within White, Cumberland and Van Buren counties and are known as “Scott's Gulf.” Nothing in this subsection (d) shall be construed to obligate the wildlife resources agency to fully fund the purchase of this real property either from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund or from any other state fund under the control of the agency.

Notwithstanding this part, § 67-4-409 or any other law to the contrary, the executive director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the purpose of acquiring certain upland hardwood forests which are located within Scott, Campbell, Morgan and Anderson counties known as “International Paper Company Properties,” including lands adjacent thereto.

Notwithstanding this part, § 67-4-409 or any other law to the contrary, the executive director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the purpose of acquiring certain upland hardwood forests which are located within Monroe County and known as “Turkey Pen,” including lands adjacent thereto.

Notwithstanding this part, § 67-4-409, or any other law to the contrary, the executive director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the purpose of acquiring certain upland hardwood forests which are located within Morgan County and known as the “McCartt Tract,” including lands adjacent thereto.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 1; 1989, ch. 458, § 1; 1989, ch. 461, § 5; 1991, ch. 140, § 1; 1997, ch. 542, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 955, § 1; 1998, ch. 956, § 1; 2002, ch. 864, § 1; 2014, ch. 702, § 1; 2016, ch. 1027, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 461, § 4 deleted the repeal of this section by Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 9.

The Food Security Act of 1985, referred to in this section, is codified throughout U.S.C. titles 7 and 16.

Acts 1998, ch. 955, § 1, provided that notwithstanding the provisions of this part, § 67-4-409 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the director of the wildlife resources agency is authorized to expend a sum not to exceed two hundred seventeen thousand dollars ($217,000) from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund for the sole purpose of completing the study of the stabilization, maintenance, renovation and revitalization of Reelfoot Lake to preserve its use as a recreational and natural resource in this state.

Acts 1998, ch. 956, § 2 provided that provisions of that act shall only authorize the director of the wildlife resources agency to make expenditures from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund in an amount not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to purchase property authorized to be purchased by the provisions of that act. If appraisal costs and acquisition charges and costs or both require expenditures in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), with approval of the state building commission, such charges and costs may also be paid from the 1986 wetland acquisition fund.

Acts 2002, ch. 864, § 2 provided that the executive director of the wildlife resources agency in developing plans for managing the lands known as the “International Paper Company Properties” including lands adjacent thereto is encouraged to address the concerns contained in a resolution adopted by the Anderson County commission in May, 2002, suggesting maximizing the benefits to reach the largest number of users, local and otherwise, through inclusion of programs designed to accommodate more diverse groups than those traditionally considered in connection with wildlife management areas. Further, the executive director and the partners in acquisition of these lands, are encouraged to work with local governments to consider making portions of the lands available for local purposes if the need arises.

Cross-References. Koppers Properties, § 11-14-407.

Wetland acquisition fund, § 67-4-409.

Wildlife preserves and restoration projects, title 70, ch. 5.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

11-14-402. Acquisition priorities.

Priorities for wetland and bottomland hardwood forest acquisition shall be directed jointly by the director of the wildlife resources agency and the commissioner of agriculture, or their designees. The two (2) shall meet periodically as needed to set the priorities for wetland and bottomland hardwood forest acquisition, and no individual tract shall be purchased without the joint consent of the commissioner of agriculture and the director of the wildlife resources agency. The requirements of this section shall be met before any steps in wetland and bottomland hardwood forest acquisition, as described in § 11-14-403, are taken.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 461, § 4 deleted the repeal of this section by Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 9.

11-14-403. Agreement with private corporations to identify and acquire wetlands and forests.

The director of the wildlife resources agency, with the approval of the state building commission, may identify appropriate private, nonprofit corporations to assist with acquisition of wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests on behalf of the state. The director is authorized, with the approval of the state building commission, to enter into agreements with such corporations to permit the corporations to purchase surveys, appraisals, title work, and other services required for the acquisition of interest in wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests; provided, that contractors selected by the corporations for the purposes must be properly licensed in Tennessee for these purposes. The director is further authorized, with the approval of the state building commission, to accept such surveys, appraisals, title work, and services on behalf of the state, and to enter into agreements with such corporations to acquire options and to preacquire on behalf of the state interests in wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests. The director may, through such agreements, commit the state to reimburse the corporations for their costs of acquisition and for their costs of capital. The state building commission shall establish a form for such agreements.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 461, § 4 deleted the repeal of this section by Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 9.

11-14-404. Inventory of wetlands and forests.

The director is authorized to maintain an inventory of rare and significant biological and geological wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests worthy of protection under the terms and conditions of this part. Such inventory shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, locations for unique wetlands, scenic wetlands, wetlands which are excellent examples of wildlife habitat, areas exhibiting exceptional ecological values, and bottomland hardwood forests.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 461, § 4 deleted the repeal of this section by Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 9.

11-14-405. Property tax exemption.

Wetlands and bottomland hardwood forests acquired by the state of Tennessee shall be exempt from all state and local property taxes.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 8.

11-14-406. Compensation fund.

There is hereby created a special agency account in the state general fund to be known as the compensation fund. Expenditures from such fund shall only be made to implement and effectuate the purposes of this part. Funds deposited in such fund shall not revert at the end of any fiscal year and all interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be returned to and made a part of the fund. The first three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) deposited in the 1986 wetland acquisition fund shall be transferred and credited to the “compensation fund.”

On or before January 1 of each year, the commissioner of general services shall certify to the comptroller of the treasury such information as is necessary to identify the parcels of property that have been rendered tax exempt pursuant to this part during the prior fiscal year. The comptroller of the treasury shall determine the appropriate tax rate and assessed value of every parcel of property acquired by the wildlife resources agency regardless of whether the land was acquired with wetlands funds, and, on or before March 1 of each year, shall certify to the commissioner of finance and administration the amount of property tax revenue lost by each affected city or county the prior fiscal year. The assessed value shall be based on the use value provided for in title 67, chapter 5, part 10, if the property is of sufficient size to have been classified under that part. Acquisition pursuant to this part of property classified under title 67, chapter 5, part 10, shall not constitute a change in the use of the property, and no rollback taxes shall become due solely as a result of such acquisition. If the property is not of sufficient size to have been classified under title 67, chapter 5, part 10, the assessed value shall be determined according to the same basis as other like property within the jurisdiction. Each subsequent yearly reimbursement amount shall be based on the same assessed value, tax rate and use in effect on the date of purchase. The commissioner of finance and administration shall reimburse each affected city and county the amount so determined from funds available in the compensation fund. In any year in which funds available in the compensation fund are insufficient to fully reimburse such cities and counties, the commissioner of finance and administration shall effect a transfer of funds from the 1986 Wetland Acquisition Fund to the compensation fund in an amount sufficient to fully reimburse the affected cities and counties. Funds transferred from the 1986 Wetland Acquisition Fund to the compensation fund along with interest, if any, accruing on such funds after their transfer to the compensation fund, shall be expended to reimburse affected cities and counties only for lands purchased under the U.A. Moore Wetlands Acquisition Act. If there is an amount owing on June 19, 1997, to a city or a county for a reimbursement, due to insufficient funds having been available in the compensation fund, such amount owing shall be paid to the affected city or county under the terms of this part.

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 8; 1987, ch. 121, § 1; 1989, ch. 461, § 1; 1997, ch. 542, § 3; 2018, ch. 1013, § 1; 2020, ch. 795, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “general services” for “finance and administration”, “property that have been” for “property which have been” and inserted “during the prior fiscal year”, and at the end of the second sentence, substituted “fiscal year” for “calendar year”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 795, § 3. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Wetland acquisition fund, § 67-4-409.

Attorney General Opinions. Greenbelt rollback tax liability on land converted to exempt status. OAG 10-71, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 77 (5/21/10).

Greenbelt rollback tax liability on land purchased through the wetlands acquisition fund. OAG 12-51, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (5/9/12).

11-14-407. Condemnation or eminent domain prohibited — Exception.

No property shall be acquired under this part through condemnation or the use of eminent domain under title 29, chapters 16 and 17, with the exception that condemnation or the use of eminent domain may be used to acquire, under this part, certain property in Scott and Campbell counties known as the “Koppers Properties.”

Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 5; 1991, ch. 278, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 461, § 4 deleted the repeal of this section by Acts 1986, ch. 833, § 9.

Cross-References. Koppers Properties, § 11-14-401.